Oklahoma, session 2025, SB719.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 500.2, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 63, O.S.L. 2022 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 500.2), is amended to read as follows:


Section 500.2. A. Officials and employees of the state,


traveling on authorized state business, may be reimbursed for


expenses incurred in such travel in accordance with the provisions


of the State Travel Reimbursement Act and existing statutes relating


to state travel. Persons who are not state employees, but who are

Req. No. 1453 Page 1


performing substantial and necessary services to the state which


have been directed or approved by the appropriate department


official, shall enjoy the protection of the sovereign immunity of


the state to the same extent as a paid employee. Such persons may


be reimbursed for expenses incurred during authorized official


travel under these same statutory provisions; provided, it is


indicated on the claim the person is not a state employee, a


description of services performed is entered, and the agency head by


approval of the claim certifies such services were substantial and


necessary, and germane to the duties and functions of the


reimbursing agency. Travel expenses incurred by a person during the


course of seeking employment with a state agency, unless such travel


is performed at the request of the employing agency, shall not be


considered expenses incurred in performing substantial and necessary


services to the state and shall not be reimbursed under the


provisions of the State Travel Reimbursement Act.


B. The chief administrative officer of the Department of Public


Safety, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, the Oklahoma


State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, the Military


Department of the State of Oklahoma, the Department of Corrections,


the Office of Management and Enterprise Services, the Alcoholic


Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission, the Oklahoma Department of


Agriculture, Food, and Forestry, the Oklahoma Department of


Emergency Management, the State Fire Marshal, and the State

Req. No. 1453 Page 2


Department of Health may arrange for and charge meals and lodging


for a contingent of state personnel moved into an area for the


purpose of preserving the public health, safety, or welfare or for


the protection of life or property. The cost for meals or lodging


so charged shall not exceed the amount authorized in the State


Travel Reimbursement Act. The chief administrative officer of each


agency involved in such an operation shall require the vendor


furnishing meals, lodging, or both meals and lodging to submit an


itemized statement for payment. When a claim for lodging is made


for a contingent of state personnel, individual members of the


contingent may not submit a claim for lodging. When a claim for


meals is made for a contingent of state personnel, individual


members of the contingent may not submit a claim for meals.


C. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce, the Oklahoma Center for


the Advancement of Science and Technology, and the Oklahoma


Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry are hereby authorized


to enter into contracts and agreements for the payment of food,


lodging, meeting facility and beverage expenses as may be necessary


for sponsoring seminars and receptions relating to economic


development and science and technology issues. Such expenses may be


paid directly to the contracting agency or business establishment.


The Director Chief Executive Officer of the Oklahoma Department of


Commerce, the President of the Oklahoma Center for the Advancement


of Science and Technology, and the Commissioner of Agriculture shall

Req. No. 1453 Page 3


each provide a quarterly report of such expenditures to the


Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate.


D. The Native American Cultural and Educational Authority is


hereby authorized to enter into contracts and agreements for the


payment of food, lodging, and meeting facility as may be necessary


to pursue the promotion of fundraising, marketing, and development


of Native American educational programs and cultural projects, or to


sponsor luncheons, seminars, and receptions relating to Native


American educational, cultural, museum, and economic development


issues. Such expenses may be paid directly to the contracting


agency or business establishment. The Executive Director of the


Native American Cultural and Educational Authority shall provide a


monthly report of expenditures to the Native American Cultural and


Educational Authority Board.


E. For purposes of this section:


1. “State agency” means any constitutionally or statutorily


created state board, commission, or department, including the


Legislature and the Courts;


2. State agencies are authorized to enter into contracts and


agreements for the payment of food and lodging expenses as may be


necessary for employees or other persons who are performing


substantial and necessary services to the state by attending


official conferences, meetings, seminars, workshops, or training

Req. No. 1453 Page 4


sessions or in the performance of their duties. Such expenses may


be paid directly to the contracting agency or business


establishment;, provided the meeting qualifies for overnight travel


for the employees and the cost for food and lodging for each


employee shall not exceed the total daily rate as provided in the


State Travel Reimbursement Act;


3. State agencies are authorized to enter into contracts and


agreements for the payment of conference registration expenses as


may be necessary for employees or other persons who are performing


substantial and necessary services to the state by attending


official conferences, meetings, seminars, workshops, or training


sessions. Such expenses may be paid directly to the contracting


agency or business establishment; and


4. State agencies are authorized to enter into contracts and


agreements for the payment of food and lodging expenses as may be


necessary for employees attending an official course of instruction


or training conducted or sponsored by any state agency. Expenses


may be paid directly to the contracting agency or business


establishment. The cost for food and lodging for each employee


shall not exceed the total daily rate as provided in the State


Travel Reimbursement Act.


F. State agencies are authorized to make direct purchases of


commercial airline tickets for use by employees in approved out-of-


state travel. Each claim or invoice submitted to the Director of

Req. No. 1453 Page 5


the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for the payment of


the purchase shall bear the airline identifying ticket number, the


name of the airline, total cost of each ticket purchased, class of


accommodation, and name of the employee for whom the ticket was


purchased and shall be filed on claim forms as prescribed by the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services. The


employee shall sign an affidavit stating that the employee used a


direct purchase commercial airline ticket received for his or her


approved out-of-state travel, or in lieu of the affidavit, the


employee may file a travel claim in connection with said airline


flight.


G. 1. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services is hereby authorized to enter into contracts and agreements


for the payment of food, lodging, and other authorized expenses as


may be necessary to host, conduct, sponsor, or participate in


conferences, meetings, or training sessions. The Director may


establish accounts as necessary for the collection and distribution


of funds, including funds of sponsors and registration fees, related


to such conferences, meetings, and training sessions. Expenses


incurred may be paid directly to the contracting agency or business


establishment.


2. The cost of food for persons attending any conferences,


meetings, and training sessions that do not require overnight travel



Req. No. 1453 Page 6


shall not exceed the total daily rate as provided in the State


Travel Reimbursement Act.


H. 1. The Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services is hereby authorized to enter into


contracts and agreements for the payment of food, lodging, and other


authorized expenses as may be necessary to host, conduct, sponsor,


or participate in conferences, meetings, or training sessions. The


Commissioner may establish accounts as necessary for the collection


and distribution of funds, including funds of sponsors and


registration fees, related to such conferences, meetings, and


training sessions. Any expenses incurred may be paid directly to


the contracting agency or business establishment.


2. The cost of food for persons attending any conferences,


meetings, and training sessions that do not require overnight travel


shall not exceed the total daily rate as provided in the State


Travel Reimbursement Act.


I. The Oklahoma Indigent Defense System is hereby authorized to


enter into contracts and agreements for the payment of lodging as


necessary for employees to carry out their duties in representing


any client whom the System has been properly appointed to represent.


Such expenses may be paid directly to the contracting agency or


business establishment. The cost for lodging for each employee


shall not exceed the daily rate as provided in the State Travel


Reimbursement Act.

Req. No. 1453 Page 7


J. The Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department is hereby


authorized to enter into contracts and agreements for the payment of


food, lodging, and meeting facility and beverage expenses as may be


necessary for seminars and receptions relating to familiarization


tours and tourism development. The expenses may be paid directly to


the contracting agency or business establishment. The Executive


Director of the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department shall


provide a monthly report of any such expenditures to the Oklahoma


Tourism and Recreation Commission.


K. The Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department is hereby


authorized to enter into contracts and agreements for the payment of


exhibitor fees and display space charges at expositions to promote


the Department’s recreational facilities and the tourism and


recreation industry. The expenses may be paid directly to the


contracting agency or business establishment; provided, that no


payment shall be made prior to the event unless it conveys a


property right to the state for future availability and use.


L. 1. The Oklahoma Highway Safety Office of the Department of


Public Safety is hereby authorized to enter into contracts and


agreements for the payment of food, lodging, and other authorized


expenses as may be necessary to host, conduct, sponsor, or


participate in highway-safety-related conferences, workshops,


seminars, meetings, or training sessions. The payments shall be for


all persons in attendance, including, but not limited to, employees

Req. No. 1453 Page 8


of political subdivisions or employees of the state or federal


government. For purposes specified in this paragraph, only federal


highway safety funds may be used in accordance with federal


guidelines and regulations, and no appropriated state funds shall be


used.


2. The cost of food for persons attending any highway safety


conferences, workshops, seminars, meetings, and training sessions


that do not require overnight travel shall not exceed the total


daily rate as provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act.


M. 1. The Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation is hereby authorized to enter into contracts and


agreements for the payment of food, lodging and other authorized


expenses as may be necessary to host, conduct, sponsor or


participate in any conference, meeting, training session or


initiative to promote the mission and purposes of the Bureau. The


payments may be for all persons in attendance, including, but not


limited to, employees of political subdivisions or employees of the


state or federal government.


2. The cost of food for persons that do not require overnight


travel shall not exceed the total daily rate as provided in the


State Travel Reimbursement Act.


N. The Oklahoma Homeland Security Director is hereby authorized


to enter into contracts and agreements for the payment of food,


lodging and other authorized expenses as may be necessary to host,

Req. No. 1453 Page 9


conduct, sponsor, or participate in homeland-security-related


conferences, meetings, workshops, seminars, exercises or training


sessions. The expenses may be paid directly to the contracting


agency or business establishment.


O. The State Department of Education is hereby authorized to


enter into contracts and agreements for the payment of food, lodging


and other authorized expenses as may be necessary to host, conduct,


sponsor or participate in conferences, meetings or training


sessions. The State Department of Education may establish accounts


as necessary for the collection and distribution of funds, including


funds of sponsors and registration fees, related to such


conferences, meetings and training sessions. Any expenses incurred


may be paid directly to the contracting agency or business


establishment.


P. 1. The Insurance Commissioner of the Insurance Department


of the State of Oklahoma is hereby authorized to enter into


contracts and agreements for the payment of food, lodging, and other


authorized expenses as may be necessary to host, conduct, sponsor,


or participate in conferences, meetings, or training sessions. The


Commissioner may establish accounts as necessary for the collection


and distribution of funds, including funds of sponsors and


registration fees, related to such conferences, meetings, and


training sessions. Any expenses incurred may be paid directly to


the contracting agency or business establishment.

Req. No. 1453 Page 10


2. The cost of food for persons attending any conferences,


meetings, and training sessions that do not require overnight travel


shall not exceed the total daily rate as provided in the State


Travel Reimbursement Act.


Q. 1. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education is are


hereby authorized to enter into contracts and agreements for the


payment of food, lodging, and other authorized expenses as may be


necessary to host, conduct, sponsor, or participate in conferences,


meetings, or training sessions. The Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education may establish accounts as necessary for the


collection and distribution of funds, including funds of sponsors


and registration fees, related to such conferences, meetings, and


training sessions. Any expenses incurred may be paid directly to


the contracting agency or business establishment.


2. The cost of food for persons attending any conferences,


meetings, and training sessions that do not require overnight travel


shall not exceed the total daily rate as provided in the State


Travel Reimbursement Act.


R. 1. The Office of Educational Quality and Accountability is


hereby authorized to enter into contracts and agreements for the


payment of food, lodging, and other authorized expenses as may be


necessary to host, conduct, sponsor, or participate in conferences,


meetings, or training sessions. The Office of Educational Quality


and Accountability may establish accounts as necessary for the

Req. No. 1453 Page 11


collection and distribution of funds, including funds of sponsors


and registration fees, related to such conferences, meetings, and


training sessions. Any expenses incurred may be paid directly to


the contracting agency or business establishment.


2. The cost of food for persons attending any conferences,


meetings, and training sessions that do not require overnight travel


shall not exceed the total daily rate as provided in the State


Travel Reimbursement Act.


S. 1. The Oklahoma Department of Securities is hereby


authorized to enter into contracts and agreements for the payment of


food, lodging, meeting facility, facilitator fees and travel


expenses, exhibitor fees and other authorized expenses as may be


necessary to host, conduct, sponsor or participate in conferences,


meetings, training sessions or initiatives promoting or otherwise


relating to investor education. The Oklahoma Department of


Securities may establish accounts as necessary for the collection


and distribution of funds, including funds of sponsors and


registration fees, related to such conferences, meetings, training


sessions or initiatives. The payments may be for all persons in


attendance, including, but not limited to, employees of the state or


federal government or employees of political subdivisions of the


state, including employees of boards of public education. Expenses


incurred may be paid directly to the contracting agency or business


establishment.

Req. No. 1453 Page 12


2. The cost of food for persons attending any conferences,


meetings and training sessions that do not require overnight travel


shall not exceed the total daily rate as provided in the State


Travel Reimbursement Act.


3. The Oklahoma Department of Securities is hereby authorized


to pay stipends to teachers participating in the investor education


program and monetary achievement awards to select participating


students. No appropriated state funds shall be used.


T. 1. The Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs is hereby


authorized to enter into contracts and agreements for the payment of


food, lodging, meeting facility, beverage and other authorized


expenses as may be necessary to host, conduct, sponsor or


participate in seminars, receptions, conferences, meetings or


training sessions related to the support of veterans and the


development of veterans’ services. Expenses incurred may be paid


directly to the contracting agency or business establishment. The


Executive Director of the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs


shall provide a monthly report of any such expenditures to the


Oklahoma Veterans Commission.


2. The cost of food for persons attending any conferences,


meetings and training sessions that do not require overnight travel


shall not exceed the total daily rate as provided in the State


Travel Reimbursement Act.



Req. No. 1453 Page 13


U. Whenever possible it shall be the policy of each state


agency to prepay airline fares and lodging expenses using a purchase


card issued to the agency. This policy shall apply to instances


where employees of the agency are traveling on behalf of state


government.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 500.9, as


amended by Section 5, Chapter 63, O.S.L. 2022 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 500.9), is amended to read as follows:


Section 500.9. A. Reimbursement for overnight lodging, while


in official travel status, may be made at an amount authorized by


the provisions of the federal Government Services Administration


(GSA) in its Federal Travel Regulation (FTR), 42 C.F.R., Section


300-1.1 et seq., and as updated in its FTR Bulletins bulletins for


travel while away from home without additional documentation or the


actual cost, if lower, per night except as provided in subsections


B, C, E, and G of this section and Section 500.9A of this title.


Receipts issued by the hotel, motel or other public lodging place


shall accompany claims for reimbursement.


B. State officers or employees attending meetings, workshops,


conferences or other objectives of trips which are conducted at a


designated hotel, motel or other public lodging place or where


lodging has been arranged for by the blocking of rooms or by rate


reductions for the participants by the sponsor as evidenced by the


announcement or notice of the meeting, workshop, conference or other

Req. No. 1453 Page 14


objective shall be reimbursed the actual lodging expense not to


exceed the single occupancy room rate charged by the designated


hotel, motel or other public lodging place; provided, that the


officials or employees are in official travel status approved by the


agency head or designee. Provided further, those state officers or


employees attending meetings, workshops, conferences or other


objectives of trips, which are conducted at a designated hotel,


motel or other public lodging place as provided by this subsection,


who choose to acquire less expensive lodging at another hotel, motel


or other public lodging place shall be reimbursed the actual lodging


expense not to exceed the single occupancy room rate charged by the


designated hotel, motel or other public lodging place. Provided


further, those state officers or employees so choosing this option


shall be reimbursed for local transportation costs incurred


traveling between such optional lodging and the designated hotel,


motel or other public lodging place not to exceed the difference


between the cost of the designated lodging and the cost of the


optional lodging. Receipts issued by the hotel, motel or other


public lodging place shall accompany claims for reimbursement.


C. State officers and employees who have been required to


attend hearings or meetings of any congressional committee or


subcommittee or any federal agency, board or commission shall be


reimbursed for their actual and necessary travel and lodging



Req. No. 1453 Page 15


expenses; however, the agency head must approve any claims in


connection with such expenses.


D. Reimbursement for meals and lodging on out-of-state trips


shall not begin more than one (1) calendar day before the meeting,


workshop, conference or other objective of trip begins and shall not


continue more than one (1) calendar day after said the meeting,


workshop, conference or other objective of trip ends. This twenty-


four-hour limit shall also apply for in-state travel when the agency


determines that travel is of a duration where overnight travel prior


to or after the trip objective would be necessary.


E. Reimbursement for meals and lodging incurred in official


travel in areas outside of the United States to implement the


objectives of contracts, grants, agreements or gifts for which funds


from these sources are furnished shall be reimbursed from said such


funds at actual cost not to exceed the amount authorized for United


States Government government employees in its periodical publication


entitled “Standard Regulations (Government Civilians, Foreign


Areas), Department of State, Washington, DC”. Provided, however,


reimbursement for travel to points outside of the United States,


whether performed under authority of contract, grant, agreement or


otherwise, shall not begin more than two (2) calendar days before or


end more than two (2) calendar days after the objective of the trip.


F. Claims submitted to the Director of the Office of Management


and Enterprise Services for payment under the provisions of this

Req. No. 1453 Page 16


section shall be certified to by the principal fiscal officer or


contract and grant administrator of each agency approving officer as


prescribed by Section 34.68 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


Such officer shall certify that such claim complies with and is


authorized under this section.


G. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services agency approving officer may authorize reimbursement for


overnight lodging while in official travel status within the State


of Oklahoma this state at a rate of up to one hundred fifty percent


(150%) of the amount authorized in subsection A of this section if


it is determined that no lodging was available at the maximum rate


set out in subsection A of this section. Prior to authorizing such


payment, the state agency approving officer or employee shall


certify receive in writing a verification by the employee of the


efforts made to obtain lodging at the rate set out in subsection A


of this section and the reasons why such lodging was not available


within a reasonable distance from the state officer’s or employee’s


work location.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 500.14, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 500.14. The Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services shall may reject any travel claim or voucher not


in conformity with the provisions of this act the State Travel



Req. No. 1453 Page 17


Reimbursement Act or existing statutes relating to reimbursement for


travel expenses.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1453 RD 1/19/2025 5:41:57 AM







































Req. No. 1453 Page 18